Hawaii statutes.
§431L-2 State's right to third party
payments. To the extent that payment has been made under the state plan
for medical assistance for health care items or services furnished to an
individual in any case where another party has a legal liability to make
payment for such assistance, the State is considered to have acquired the
rights of the individual to payment by the other party for those health care
items or services. [L 1995, c 83, pt of §2; am L 2009, c 103, §4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next